Tennessee, session 114, HB1644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
39-17-2001. This part is known and may be cited as the "Nitrous Oxide Abuse
Prevention and Retail Sale Prohibition Act."
39-17-2002. As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Nitrous oxide" means:
(A) N2O, a colorless gas or liquid that is also referred to as
dinitrogen monoxide, nitrogen oxide, or laughing gas; and
(B) Any substance containing nitrous oxide;
(2) "Sales at retail" means and includes any transfer, made in the
ordinary course of trade or in the usual prosecution of a vape shop retailer's
business, of nitrous oxide to the purchaser for use or consumption and for a
valuable consideration;
(3) "Vape shop" means any premises dedicated to the display, sale,
distribution, delivery, offering, furnishing, or marketing of electronic smoking
devices, liquid nicotine, liquid nicotine containers, or vapor products; and
(4) "Vape shop retailer" means every person, partnership, firm,
corporation, or association engaged in the business of making sales at retail of
HB1644
009926
- 1 -

electronic smoking devices, liquid nicotine, liquid nicotine containers, vapor
products, or nitrous oxide within this state.
39-17-2003.
(a) Notwithstanding § 39-17-452, it is an offense for a vape shop retailer,
or a distributor, wholesaler, or importer of vape products, who sells or offers for
sale a vapor product for retail sale in this state to sell nitrous oxide.
(b)
(1) The following penalties apply to violations of this section:
(A)
(i) A vape shop retailer, or a distributor, wholesaler,
or importer of vape products, who sells or offers for sale
nitrous oxide for retail sale in this state is subject to a civil
penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each
individual product offered for sale in violation of this
section;
(ii) The civil penalty for a second violation under
this subdivision (b)(1) within a twelve-month period is at
least seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) but not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) per product, and the
suspension of the license of the vape shop retailer, or
distributor, wholesaler, or importer of vape products for
thirty (30) calendar days; and
(iii) The civil penalty for a third violation under this
subdivision (b)(1) within a twelve-month period is at least
one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than one
- 2 - 009926

thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per product, and
the revocation of the license of the vape shop retailer, or
distributor, wholesaler, or importer of vape products; and
(B) A manufacturer who knowingly causes nitrous oxide to
be sold for retail sale in this state, whether directly or through a
vape shop retailer, or a distributor, wholesaler, or importer of vape
products, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, is subject to a
civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each individual
nitrous oxide product offered for sale in violation of this section.
(2) In an action to enforce this section, the state is entitled to
recover costs, including the costs of investigation, expert witness fees,
and reasonable attorney fees.
(3) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a repeated
violation of this section constitutes a deceptive trade practice under § 47-
18-104.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009926